Utah statutes.
70D-2-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), "broker" means a person who in the regular course of business assists a person in obtaining a mortgage loan for a fee or other consideration paid directly or indirectly.

(b)  "Broker" does not include a person solely because of the person's:

(i)  real estate brokerage activities; or

(ii)  activities as an attorney licensed to practice law in this state who, in the course of the attorney's practice as an attorney, assists a person in obtaining a mortgage loan.

(2)  "Business as a lender, broker, or servicer" means a person who engages in an act for compensation or in the expectation of compensation that makes the person a lender, broker, or servicer.

(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3)(b), "lender" means a person who in the regular course of business originates a loan secured by a mortgage.

(b)  "Lender" does not include a person who:

(i)  as a seller only receives one or more mortgages as security for a purchase money obligation; or

(ii)  only receives a mortgage as security for an obligation:

(A)  payable on an installment or deferred payment basis; and

(B)  arising out of materials furnished or services rendered in the improvement of real property.

(4)  "Manufactured home" means a transportable factory built housing unit that:

(a)  is constructed:

(i)  on or after June 15, 1976, according to the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974; and

(ii)  in one or more sections, which:

(A)  in the traveling mode, is eight body feet or more in width or 40 body feet or more in length; or

(B)  when erected on site, is 400 or more square feet;

(b)  is built on a permanent chassis;

(c)  is designed to be used as a dwelling with or without a permanent foundation when connected to the required utilities; and

(d)  includes the plumbing, heating, air-conditioning, and electrical systems.

(5)  "Mobile home" means a transportable factory built housing unit built before June 15, 1976, in accordance with a state mobile home code that existed before the National Manufactured Housing Construction and Safety Standards Act of 1974.

(6)  "Modular home" means a modular unit as defined in Section 15A-1-302.

(7)  "Permanently affixed" means anchored to, and supported by, a permanent foundation or installed in accordance with the manufactured housing installation standard code referred to in Section 15A-1-202.

(8)  "Servicer" means a person who in the regular course of business assumes responsibility for servicing and accepting payments for a mortgage loan.



Amended by Chapter 399, 2013 General Session

